Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Airport Development

183.762.
Contracts with federal government for federal aid in airport development.

The Kentucky Transportation Cabinet, any governmental unit, or the cabinet together with any governmental unit may contract with the federal government in regard to the development of airports under any Act of Congress providing federal aid to the states in airport development.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 3; 1960, ch. 179, § 66.

183.763.
Contractual powers.

The cabinet may contract with a governmental unit or other person, and a governmental unit may contract with the cabinet or any person in regard to the development of airports and other aeronautical matters.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 4; 1958, ch. 153, § 47; 1960, ch. 179, § 67; 1964, ch. 134, § 16.

183.764.
State aid for public airports.

The cabinet is authorized to render financial assistance by grant or loan or both to any governmental unit in the development of an airport owned or controlled or to be owned or controlled by such governmental unit out of appropriations made by the General Assembly for such purposes. Such financial assistance may be furnished in connection with federal aid, local or other funds available for airport purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 5; 1960, ch. 179, § 68; 1964, ch. 134, § 17.

183.765.
Airport development.

Airport development in Kentucky may be undertaken and paid for by the state, the United States and governmental units. Costs for development may be borne by any one (1) of these or by any combination.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 6; 1960, ch. 179, § 69; 1964, ch. 134, § 18; 1982, ch. 274, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

183.766.
State may match federal funds.

The cabinet may set apart out of moneys appropriated to it for state airport development an amount equal to any sum allotted to the state by the federal government or any sum necessary to carry on cooperative work with the federal government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 7; 1960, ch. 179, § 70.

183.767.
State aid conditioned on acquisition of necessary land.

As a condition precedent to the expenditure of any state funds for the development of any airport in the state, the cabinet may require that the governmental unit or units shall have, or be in a position to acquire, all lands or other property interests which in the judgment of the cabinet are necessary for the development of the airport.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 8; 1960, ch. 179, § 71; 1964, ch. 134, § 19.

183.768.
No aid for private airports.

The cabinet shall not expend any funds appropriated or made available by the state for the development of public airports, upon any private airports.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 9; 1960, ch. 179, § 72.

183.769.
Compliance with laws and regulations.

Whenever state funds are used or sought to be used, all governmental units in this state, whether acting alone or jointly with another governmental unit or with the United States government or with the state, shall comply with the terms of KRS

183.763

to

183.772

and all rules and regulations adopted thereunder, and secure the approval of the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 10; 1960, ch. 179, § 73; 1964, ch. 134, § 20.

183.770.
Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

183.771.
Title to airport property.

The provisions of KRS

56.030

do not apply to land or interest in land or easements thereon partly or wholly paid for out of state funds used in the construction, alteration, or development of public airports in the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 12; 1960, ch. 179, § 74.

183.772.
Kentucky airport development fund — Sources — Use — Continuation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund to be known as the “Kentucky Airport Development Fund”. All moneys deposited or paid into this fund, including repayment of any loans made therefrom, are appropriated and shall be available to the cabinet for the purposes of KRS

183.763

through

183.771

. All moneys in such fund shall be expended solely for the development of airports or administrative cost incidental to the development of airports. The fund shall consist of all money appropriated by the state and all money received from the United States or from any other source for the purpose of airport development. All moneys in the Kentucky airport development fund shall be deposited, administered and disbursed in the same manner and under the same conditions and requirements as are provided by law for other special funds in the State Treasury, except that any balance in this fund shall not lapse at any time but shall be continuously available to the cabinet for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of KRS

183.763

through

183.771

. A general statement that all continuing appropriations are repealed shall not be construed as abolishing this fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 239, § 13; 1950, ch. 133; 1960, ch. 179, § 75; 1964, ch. 134, § 21.

183.781.
Definitions for KRS 183.781 to 183.793. [Repealed.]

183.782.
Airport Development Commission; membership; expenses. [Repealed.]

183.783.
Commission’s powers and duties. [Repealed.]

183.784.
Power to accept gifts, borrow money, issue bonds. [Repealed.]

183.785.
Details of airport project acquisition. [Repealed.]

183.786.
Qualities of bonds. [Repealed.]

183.787.
Commission’s disposition of funds received. [Repealed.]

183.788.
Sinking fund reserve. [Repealed.]

183.789.
Two or more agencies; effect of default of one. [Repealed.]

183.790.
Further bond issue for same project. [Repealed.]

183.791.
Bondholder’s rights. [Repealed.]

183.792.
Refunding bonds. [Repealed.]

183.793.
Additional and alternative character of KRS 183.781 to 183.793. [Repealed.]